District of Columbia statutes.
21-549

Preservation of other rights to release.

Nothing in this chapter prohibits a person from exercising a right presently available to him for obtaining release from confinement, including the right to petition for a writ of habeas corpus.

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 757, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1
Apr. 4, 2003, D.C. Law 14-283, § 2(y), 50 DCR 917
1981 Ed., § 21-549.
1973 Ed., § 21-549.
D.C. Law 14-283 substituted “Nothing in this chapter prohibits” for “ Sections 21-546 to 21-548 do not prohibit”.
Section 2(x) of D.C. Law 14-131 substituted “Nothing in this chapter prohibits” for “ Sections 21-546 to 21-548 do not prohibit”.
Section 5(b) of D.C. Law 14-131 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(x) of Mental Health Commitment Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-265, January 30, 2002, 49 DCR 1450).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(x) of Mental Health Commitment Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-350, April 24, 2002, 49 DCR 4417).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(y) of Mental Health Civil Commitment Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-546, December 12, 2002, 50 DCR 199).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(y) of Mental Health Civil Commitment Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-41, March 24, 2003, 50 DCR 2784).